Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1775.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 11, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1604.21, to read: START_STATUTE41-1604.21. Inmate telephone system service contracts; prohibited terms The department may not enter into a contract or agreement for inmate telephone system services that Allows the department to accept or receive revenue in excess of the department's reasonable operating cost for establishing and administering the inmate telephone system services, including a contract or agreement that Allows commissions, profit sharing, percentage payments, up-front signing bonuses, inflated rent payments or the supplying of technologies that are unrelated to the actual telephone service. END_STATUTE